California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
 under this subdivision furnishes the Franchise Tax Board with a copy of the federal determination granting that individual relief under Section 6015 of the Internal Revenue Code. If the federal determination does not clearly identify the issues and liabilities for which the individual was granted relief under Section 6015 of the Internal Revenue Code, the Franchise Tax Board may request, from the individual requesting relief, any supporting documentation reasonably necessary to substantiate that the issues and liabilities for which relief is requested under this section are the same as the issues and liabilities for which the individual received relief under Section 6015 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) This subdivision does not apply if, prior to the expiration of the 30-day period described in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), the other individual that filed the joint return for which the relief is requested
 under this subdivision submits information to the Franchise Tax Board that indicates that relief should not be granted. For purposes of this paragraph, “information that indicates that relief should not be granted” is limited to the following:

(A) Information that indicates that the facts and circumstances that apply to the understatement and liabilities for which the relief is requested are not the same facts and circumstances that applied to the understatement and liabilities for which that individual was granted relief under Section 6015 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(B) Information that indicates that there has not been a federal determination granting relief under Section 6015 of the Internal Revenue Code or that the federal determination granting relief under Section 6015 of the Internal Revenue Code has been modified, altered, withdrawn, canceled, or rescinded.

(C) Information indicating that the other individual, as described in the first sentence of this paragraph, did not have the opportunity to participate, within the meaning of Section 6015 of the Internal Revenue Code and the regulations thereunder, in the federal administrative or judicial proceeding that resulted in relief under Section 6015 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(j) If, prior to the date the Franchise Tax Board issues its determination with respect to a request for relief under this section, the individual requesting relief demonstrates to the Franchise Tax Board that a request for relief has been filed with the Internal Revenue Service pursuant to Section 6015 of the Internal Revenue Code and demonstrates that the request for relief involves the same facts and circumstances as the request for relief that is pending before the Franchise Tax Board, the Franchise Tax Board
 may not deny relief with respect to that request, in whole or in part, until federal action on the request for relief under Section 6015 of the Internal Revenue Code is final. 

(k) An individual may not be granted relief under this section if a court has revised the tax liability in a proceeding for dissolution of the marriage in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 19006.

(l) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any procedure or rule prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(m) (1) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2009.

(2) The provisions of subdivision (i) and (j), as amended by the act adding
 this paragraph, shall apply on and after January 1, 2009.

(3) The amendments made to subdivisions (e), (g), and (h) shall apply to requests for relief received on or after the effective date of the act adding this paragraph.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 318, Sec. 1.   (SB 1065)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

18534.

(a) Under regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, if:

(1) An individual does not file a joint return for any taxable year,

(2) That individual does not include in gross income for that taxable year an item of community income properly includable therein,

(3) The individual establishes that he or she did not know of, and had no reason
 to know of, that item of community income, and

(4) Taking into account all facts and circumstances, it is inequitable to include that item of community income in that individual’s gross income, then, for purposes of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) and this part, that item of community income shall be included in the gross income of the other spouse (and not in the gross income of the individual).

Under procedures prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, if, taking into account all the facts and circumstances, it is inequitable to hold the individual liable for any unpaid tax or any deficiency (or any portion of either) attributable to any item for which relief is not available under the preceding sentence, the Franchise Tax Board may relieve the individual of that liability.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board may disallow the benefits of
 any community property law to any taxpayer with respect to any income if that taxpayer acted as if solely entitled to that income and failed to notify the taxpayer’s spouse before the due date (including extensions) for filing the return for the taxable year in which the income was derived of the nature and amount of that income.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that, in construing this section, any regulations that may be promulgated by the Secretary of the Treasury under Section 66(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended by Public Law 105-206, shall apply to the extent that those regulations do not conflict with this section or with any regulations that may be promulgated by the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) The amendments made by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to any liability for tax arising after the effective date of the act adding this subdivision and any
 liability for tax arising on or before that date but remaining unpaid as of that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 931, Sec. 6.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18535.

(a) In lieu of electing nonresident partners filing a return pursuant to Section 18501, the Franchise Tax Board may, pursuant to requirements and conditions set forth in forms and instructions, provide for the filing of a group return for one or more electing nonresident partners by a partnership doing business in, or deriving income from, sources in California. The tax rate or rates applicable to each electing partner’s distributive share shall consist of the highest marginal rate or rates provided by Part 10 (commencing with Section
 17001) plus, in the case of any electing nonresident partner included on the group return who would be subject to Section 17043 when filing individually, an additional tax rate of 1 percent. Except as provided in subdivision (b), no deductions shall be allowed except those necessary to determine each partner’s distributive share, and no credits shall be allowed except those directly attributable to the partnership. As required by the Franchise Tax Board, the partnership as agent for the electing partners shall make the payments of tax, additions to tax, interest, and penalties otherwise required to be paid by the electing partners.

(b) Deductions provided by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17501) of Part 10, attributable to earned income of a partner derived from a partnership filing a group return on behalf of electing nonresident partners under subdivision (a), shall be allowed if the partner certifies, in the form and manner as the
 Franchise Tax Board may prescribe, that he or she has no earned income from any other source.

(c) This section shall also be applicable to a nonresident shareholder of a corporation which is treated as an “S” corporation under Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 23800) of Part 11. In that case, the provisions of subdivisions (a) and (b) are modified to refer to“shareholder or shareholders” in lieu of “partners” and to “S” corporation in lieu of “partnership.”

(d) This section shall also be applicable to a nonresident individual with a membership or economic interest in a limited liability company, registered limited liability partnership, or foreign limited liability partnership, which is classified as a partnership for California tax purposes. In that case, the provisions of subdivisions (a) and (b) are modified to refer to “holders of a membership or economic interest” in lieu
 of “partners” and to “limited liability companies” in lieu of “partnerships,” and “partnerships” shall include registered limited liability partnerships and foreign limited liability partnerships.

(e) The Franchise Tax Board may adjust the income of an electing nonresident taxpayer included in a group return filed under this section to properly reflect income under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), including Chapter 11 thereof (commencing with Section 17951), this part (commencing with Section 18401), and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), including Chapter 17 thereof (commencing with Section 25101).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 751, Sec. 65.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

18536.

(a) In lieu of electing nonresident directors filing a return pursuant to Section 18501, the Franchise Tax Board may, pursuant to requirements and conditions set forth in applicable forms and instructions, provide for the filing of a group return by a corporation for one or more electing nonresident individuals who receive wages, salaries, fees, or other compensation from that corporation for director services, including attendance of board of directors’ meetings that take place in this state. The tax rate or rates applicable to each
 director’s compensation for services performed in this state shall consist of highest marginal rate or rates provided for by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) of Division 2 plus, in the case of any electing nonresident director included on the group return who would be subject to Section 17043 when filing individually, an additional tax rate of 1 percent and no deductions or credits shall be allowed. As required by the Franchise Tax Board, the corporation, as the agent for the electing nonresident directors, shall make the payments of tax, additions to tax, interest, and penalties otherwise required to be paid by, or imposed on, the electing directors.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board may adjust the income of an electing nonresident taxpayer included in a group return filed under this section to properly reflect the income under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) of Division 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 751, Sec. 66.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

18537.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, in lieu of nonresident aliens filing a return pursuant to Section 18501, the Franchise Tax Board shall provide for the filing of a group return by a taxpayer, or an entity authorized by the taxpayer to file on its behalf, for one or more electing nonresident aliens who receive taxable income as computed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 17041 from that taxpayer for services that take place in this state.

(b) For a nonresident alien electing to file in a group return pursuant to subdivision (a), the tax rate or rates applicable to each nonresident’s taxable income for services performed in this state for that taxpayer shall consist of the highest marginal rate or rates provided for by Part
 10 (commencing with Section 17001) plus, in the case of any electing nonresident alien included on the group return who would be subject to Section 17043 when filing individually, an additional tax rate of 1 percent, and no deductions or credits shall be allowed, except credits allowed under Section 19002.

(c) The taxpayer, or an entity authorized by the taxpayer to file on its behalf, as the agent for the electing nonresident aliens, shall make the payments of tax, additions to tax, interest, and penalties otherwise required to be paid by, or imposed on, the electing nonresident aliens.

(d) Pursuant to Section 18624, the Franchise Tax Board shall not require a nonresident alien who is not eligible for or has not been issued a federal social security number (SSN) or a federal individual taxpayer identification number (ITIN) to provide a SSN or ITIN in order to file in a group
 return under this section. If the nonresident alien subsequently becomes eligible for and is issued a SSN or ITIN, the Franchise Tax Board may require the nonresident alien to provide a letter or other form documenting the nonresident alien’s SSN or ITIN.

(e) The Franchise Tax Board may adjust the income of an electing nonresident alien taxpayer included in a group return filed under this section to properly reflect the income under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001).

(f) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may adopt regulations as necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section.

(2) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or guideline
 established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board.

(g) For purposes of this section, “nonresident alien” shall have the same meaning as described in subdivision (f) of Section 18624.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 73, Sec. 2.   (AB 1518)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

18542.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Franchise Tax Board may design tax returns to provide for the designation of contributions to specified funds, as otherwise provided by law, on a separate schedule which shall be attached to the primary return form.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18543.

For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, the Franchise Tax Board shall include a checkbox for a taxpayer to indicate on their individual income tax return that they are interested in no-cost or low-cost health care coverage and authorize the Franchise Tax Board to share information from their tax return with the California Health Benefit Exchange for purposes of providing notification
 under subdivision (b) of Section 100720 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 170, Sec. 2.   (SB 967)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

18544.

(a) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the Franchise Tax Board shall include checkboxes on resident income tax returns
 to allow individuals, including spouses filing a joint return, heads of households, or surviving spouses, to provide written consent for Donate Life California to enroll the individual in the Donate Life California Organ and Tissue Donor Registry and for the Franchise Tax Board to share the individual’s information, as described in Section 19572.5, with Donate Life California for purposes of administering that registry. The
 individual’s written consent to have their information shared with Donate Life California shall be valid for one year from the date the return is signed.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the Donate Life California Organ and Tissue Donor Registry for purposes of mutually agreeing on the language to be used on the returns pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) For purposes of this section, “Donate Life California Organ and Tissue Donor Registry” means the registry established pursuant to Section 7150.90 of the Health and Safety
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   (AB 1268)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

18551.

Section 13021 of the Unemployment Insurance Code sets forth requirements for the filing of returns and payment of tax by every employer required to withhold any personal income tax on wages.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18566.

Returns filed under this article on the basis of the calendar year shall be filed on or before the 15th day of April following the close of the calendar year. Returns made on the basis of a fiscal year shall be filed on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month following the close of the fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18567.

(a) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may grant a reasonable extension of time for filing any return, declaration, statement, or other document required by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or this part in the manner and form as the Franchise Tax Board may determine. Except as provided in paragraph (2), no extension shall be for more than six months.

(2) (A) In the case of a taxpayer residing or traveling abroad, returns shall be filed no later than the 15th day of the sixth month following the close of the taxable year, unless the requirements for extension have been fulfilled on or before that date.

(B) In the case of a partnership required to file a return under Section 18633 or 18633.5, the extension shall be for no more than seven months.

(b) An extension of time granted pursuant to this section is not an extension of time for payment of tax required to be paid on or before the due date of the return without regard to extension. Underpayment of tax penalties shall be imposed as provided by law without regard to any extension granted under this section.

(c) A reasonable
 extension for payment of tax required by this part may be granted by the Franchise Tax Board whenever in its judgment good cause exists.

(d) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to returns required to be filed for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 21, Sec. 13.   (AB 119)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

18570.

(a) In the case of an individual who is serving as a member of the armed forces of the United States or any auxiliary branch thereof, or the merchant marine, beyond the boundaries of the United States, the Franchise Tax Board shall automatically grant, without application being made therefor, an extension of time, free from interest and penalties, for filing the return (except income withheld at source), for payment of the tax (except income withheld at source), for taking any of the steps required by Sections
 19041, 19045, 19306, 19324, and 19331, until 180 days after his or her return to the United States.

(b) “United States,” as used in subdivision (a), means the 50 states of the United States and the District of Columbia.

(c) This section shall also apply to the spouse of any individual described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18571.

(a) The provisions of Section 7508 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to time for performing certain acts postponed by reason of service in a combat zone or contingency operation, shall apply except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 7508(e)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to tax in jeopardy, etc., is modified to refer to jeopardy assessments and liens authorized under this part, in lieu of the references to Section 6851 and Chapter 70 or 71 of the Internal
 Revenue Code.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 17034, this section shall be operative without regard to taxable years and shall be operative with respect to any actions specified in Section 18570 that are required or permitted to be taken on or after August 2, 1990.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 41.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

18572.

(a) Section 7508A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to postponement of certain tax-related deadlines, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 7508A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to postponement of certain tax-related deadlines, shall apply to a taxpayer determined by the Director of Finance to be affected by a state of emergency declared by the Governor.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the postponement of certain tax-related deadlines under this section shall be determined by the Director of Finance.

(d) (1) Section 7508A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to postponement of certain tax-related deadlines, shall apply to an impacted taxpayer, during an additional relief period, that requests relief pursuant to this section.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions shall apply:

(A) “Additional relief period” means the period beginning on the date the state postponement period expires, if any, and ending on the date the federal postponement period expires.

(B) “Federal postponement period” means the postponement period as defined in Section 301.7508A-1(d)(3) of Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(C) “Impacted taxpayer” means a
 taxpayer that meets both of the following:

(i) Otherwise qualifies for relief under subdivision (a) or (b), but did not file their California tax return or make payments of tax or fee, as required under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part, before the expiration of the state postponement period.

(ii) Requests relief pursuant to this section in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board and shall, upon request, submit supporting documentation related to the declared disaster, pursuant to this section.

(D) “State postponement period” means the postponement period determined by the Director of Finance pursuant to subdivision (c).

(E) “Supporting documentation” means any of the following:

(i) A letter from the Federal Emergency Management Agency that approves assistance to the impacted taxpayer pursuant to the federal Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 5121 et seq.).

(ii) A determination of
 award letter from the Small Business Administration disaster loan program that approves assistance to the impacted taxpayer.

(iii) A statement, signed under penalty of perjury, from a tax professional indicating the impacted taxpayer’s books and records that are necessary to meet a tax deadline were destroyed in the disaster area or jurisdiction for which the Governor has proclaimed a state of emergency.

(iv) A law enforcement report issued to the impacted taxpayer, related to theft or looting due to lawlessness occurring during the disaster or emergency and in the disaster area or jurisdiction for which the Governor proclaimed a state of emergency.

(v) An insurance claim submitted by or on behalf of the impacted taxpayer, related to the disaster or conditions of emergency.

(vi) Verification of disaster relief related to housing assistance, property damage, employment, public health, mortgage assistance, or business operation received from a government entity, banking institution, or organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(e) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may adopt regulations that are necessary or appropriate to implement this section.

(2) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) shall not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, guideline, or any other guidance established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(f) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to any federally declared disaster or Governor-proclaimed state of emergency on or after the effective date of the act adding this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 34, Sec. 28.   (SB 167)   Effective June 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Banks and Corporations [18601. - 18606.]

18601.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), (c), or (d), every taxpayer subject to the tax imposed by Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) shall, on or before the 15th day of the fourth month following the close of its taxable year, transmit to the Franchise Tax Board a return in a form prescribed by it, specifying for the taxable year, all the facts as it may by rule, or otherwise, require in order
 to carry out this part. A tax return, disclosing net income for any taxable year, filed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501) of Part 11 shall be deemed filed pursuant to the proper chapter of Part 11 for the same taxable period, if the chapter under which the return is filed is determined erroneous.

(b) In the case of cooperative associations described in Section 24404, returns shall be filed on or before the 15th day of the ninth month following the close of its taxable year.

(c) In the case of taxpayers required to file a return for a short period under Section 24634, the due date for the short period return shall be the same as the due date of the federal tax return that includes the net income of the taxpayer for that short period, or the due date specified in subdivision (a) if no federal return is required to be
 filed that would include the net income for that short period.

(d) (1) In the case of an “S corporation” described in Section 1361 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to S corporation defined, returns shall be filed on or before the 15th day of the third month following the close of its taxable year.

(2) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1997, each “S corporation” required to file a return under subdivision (a) for any taxable year shall, on or before the day on which the return for the taxable year was filed, furnish each person who is a shareholder at any time during the taxable year a copy of the information shown on the return.

(e) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1997:

(1) A shareholder of
 an “S corporation” shall, on the shareholder’s return, treat a Subchapter S item in a manner that is consistent with the treatment of the item on the corporate return.

(2) (A) In the case of any Subchapter S item, paragraph (1) shall not apply to that item if both of the following occur:

(i) Either of the following occurs:

(I) The corporation has filed a return, but the shareholder’s treatment of the item on the shareholder’s return is, or may be, inconsistent with the treatment of the item on the corporate return.

(II) The corporation has not filed a return.

(ii) The shareholder files with the Franchise Tax Board a statement identifying the inconsistency.

(B) A shareholder shall be treated as having complied with clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) with respect to a Subchapter S item if the shareholder does both of the following:

(i) Demonstrates to the satisfaction of the Franchise Tax Board that the treatment of the Subchapter S item on the shareholder’s return is consistent with the treatment of the item on the schedule furnished to the shareholder by the corporation.

(ii) Elects to have this paragraph apply with respect to that item.

(3) In any case described in subclause (I) of clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2), and in which the shareholder does not comply with clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2), any adjustment required to make the treatment of the items by the shareholder
 consistent with the treatment of the items on the corporate return shall be treated as arising out of a mathematical error and assessed and collected under Section 19051.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, “Subchapter S item” means any item of an “S corporation” to the extent provided by regulations that, for purposes of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or this part, the item is more appropriately determined at the corporation level than at the shareholder level.

(5) The penalties imposed under Article 7 (commencing with Section 19131) of Chapter 4 shall apply in the case of a shareholder’s negligence in connection with, or disregard of, the requirements of this section.

(f) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to returns for taxable years beginning on or after
 January 1, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 348, Sec. 1.   (AB 1775)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

18602.

In the event that taxes, interest, and penalties have been or shall be assessed against, paid by, or collected from a corporation under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101) of Part 11, which assessment, payment, or collection should have been made under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501) of Part 11, those taxes, interest, and penalties shall be considered as having been assessed, paid, or collected under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501) of Part 11 as of the date or dates they were made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18604.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board may grant a reasonable extension of time for filing any return, declaration, statement, or other document required by Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), in the manner and form as the Franchise Tax Board may determine. No extension or extensions shall aggregate more than seven months from the due date for filing the return.

(b) An extension of time granted pursuant to this section is not an extension of time for payment of tax required to
 be paid on or before the due date of the return without regard to extension. Underpayment of tax penalties shall be imposed as provided by law without regard to any extension granted under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 54.5.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18606.

(a) In cases where receivers, trustees in a case under Title 11 of the United States Code, or assignees are operating the property or business of a corporation those receivers, trustees, or assignees shall make returns for that corporation in the same manner and form as that corporation is required to make a return.

(b) Any tax due on the basis of returns made by receivers, trustees, or assignees shall be collected in the same manner as if collected from the corporation of
 whose business or property they have custody and control.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 605, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. General Provisions Applicable to All Persons [18621. - 18628.]

18621.

Except as otherwise provided by the Franchise Tax Board and in Section 18621.5, any return, declaration, statement, or other document required to be made under any provision of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), this part, or any applicable regulation shall contain, or be verified by, a written declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury. Those returns, and all other returns, declarations, statements, or other documents or copies thereof required, shall be in any form as the Franchise Tax Board
 may from time to time prescribe, including, but not limited to, on paper, on magnetic media pursuant to Section 19524, or by electronic technology or electronic imaging technology pursuant to Section 18621.5, and shall be filed with the Franchise Tax Board. The Franchise Tax Board shall prepare blank forms for the returns, declarations, statements, or other documents and shall distribute them throughout the state and furnish them upon application. Failure to receive or secure the form does not relieve any taxpayer from making any return, declaration, statement, or other document required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1243, Sec. 41.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

18621.5.

(a) Any return, declaration, statement, or other document required to be made under this part that is filed using electronic technology shall be in a form as the Franchise Tax Board may prescribe and is not complete, and therefore not filed, unless an electronic filing declaration is signed by the taxpayer, in accordance with Section 18621 in the case of individuals, subdivision (a) of Section 18505 in the case of estates or trusts, corporations, or limited liability companies classified as corporations for California income tax
 purposes, subdivision (a) of Section 18633 in the case of a partnership, or Section 18633.5 in the case of limited liability companies classified as partnerships for California income tax purposes. The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe forms and instructions for requiring the electronic filing declaration to be retained by the preparer or taxpayer and may require the declaration to be furnished to the Franchise Tax Board upon request.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any return, declaration, statement, or other document otherwise required to be signed that is filed in a traditional medium and captured using electronic imaging technology shall be deemed to be a valid original document upon reproduction to paper form by the Franchise Tax Board.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, any return, declaration, statement, or other document otherwise required to be signed that
 is filed by the taxpayer using electronic technology in a form as required by the Franchise Tax Board shall be deemed to be a signed, valid original document, including upon reproduction to paper form by the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) “Electronic imaging technology” means a system of microphotography, optical disk, or reproduction by other technique that does not permit additions, deletions, or changes to the original document. The system may include, but is not limited to, any magnetic media or other machine readable form.

(e) “Traditional medium” means any return, declaration, statement, or other document required to be made pursuant to this article other than those made using electronic imaging technology.

(f) “Electronic technology” includes, but is not limited to, computer modem, magnetic media, optical disk,
 facsimile machine, or telephone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 605, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18621.7.

The Franchise Tax Board shall not approve for electronic filing any proprietary filing software or electronic tax preparation forms that require a taxpayer to consent to the disclosure of any information for which a consent to disclose is required by Section 17530.5 of the Business and Professions Code as a condition of access to that software or to those electronic tax preparation forms.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1084, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

18621.9.

(a) If an income tax return preparer prepared more than 100 timely original individual income tax returns that were filed during any calendar year that began on and after January 1, 2003, and if in the current calendar year that income tax preparer prepares one or more acceptable individual income tax returns using tax preparation software, then, for that calendar year and for each subsequent calendar year thereafter, all acceptable individual income tax returns prepared by that income tax preparer shall be filed using electronic
 technology, as defined in Section 18621.5.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Income tax preparer” means a person that meets both of the following:

(A) Any person that prepares, in exchange for compensation, or who employs another person to prepare, in exchange for compensation, any return for the tax imposed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) (hereafter Part 10). A person that only performs those acts described in clauses (i) through (iv) of Section 7701(a)(36)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, with respect to the preparation of a return for the tax imposed by Part 10, is not an income tax preparer for purposes of this section or for purposes of Section 19170.

(B) Any person that prepares returns for the tax imposed by Part 10 that is also
 required, by this article, to include an identification number on any return prepared by that tax preparer for the tax imposed by Part 10.

(2) “Original individual income tax return” means any return that is required, by Section 18501, to be made with respect to the tax imposed by Part 10. For purposes of subdivision (a), a “timely” original individual tax return means any original individual tax return that is filed, without regard to extensions, during the calendar year for which that tax return is required to be filed.

(3) “Acceptable individual income tax return” means any original individual tax return that is authorized by the Franchise Tax Board to be filed using electronic technology, as defined in Section 18621.5. For purposes of this section, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to any rule,
 notice, or guideline issued by the Franchise Tax Board that identifies a tax return as an acceptable individual income tax return.

(4) “Tax preparation software” means any computer software program intended for accounting, tax return preparation, or tax compliance.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall cease to apply to an income tax preparer if, during the previous calendar year, that income tax preparer prepared no more than 25 original individual income tax returns.

(d) (1) This section applies to acceptable individual income tax returns required to be filed on and after January 1, 2004.

(2) This section may not be interpreted to require electronic filing of acceptable individual income tax returns that are required to be filed before
 January 1, 2004.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 455, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

18621.10.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2014, if an acceptable return of a business entity was prepared using a tax preparation software, that return shall be filed using electronic technology in a form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Acceptable return” means
 any original or amended return that is required to be filed pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 18601), Section 18633, Section 18633.5, or Article 3 (commencing with Section 23771) of Chapter 4 of Part 11, other than the return for unrelated business taxable income required by Section 23771.

(2) “Business entity” means a corporation, including an “S” corporation, an organization exempt from tax pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 23701) of Part 11, a partnership, or a limited liability company.

(3) “Tax preparation software” means any computer software program used to prepare an acceptable return or for use in tax compliance.

(4) “Electronic technology” includes, but is not limited to, the Internet, cloud computing, or an electronic information delivery system.
